Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.09
Attorney General; opinions on questions
of law; act as attorney; fees and expenses; paid from State Real Estate Commission's
Fund.

The Attorney General shall render to the State Real
Estate Commission opinions on all questions of law relating to the interpretation
of the Nebraska Real Estate License Act or
arising in the administration thereof and
shall act as attorney for the commission in all actions and proceedings brought
by or against it under or pursuant to the act. All fees and expenses
of the Attorney General arising out of such duties shall be paid out of the
State Real Estate Commission's Fund.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 9;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 4.